North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108B. Community Action Programs.
Article 2. Community Action Partnership Act.

§ 108B-21.
Short title.

This Article may be cited as the Community Action Partnership Act.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 111.1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 34(c).

Editor’s Note.

This Article is Article 1D of Chapter 113, G.S. 113-28.21 through 113-28.26, as rewritten and recodified as Article 2 of Chapter 108B by Session Laws 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 34(c). Where appropriate, the historical citations to the former sections have been added to the corresponding sections in this Article as rewritten and recodified.

§ 108B-22.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of this Article to provide financial assistance to Community Action Agencies and Limited Purpose Agencies (hereinafter referred to as “agency” or “agencies”) to enable those agencies to effectively mobilize public and private resources in order to promote economic self-sufficiency among the poor of the State and to expand those services to all political subdivisions of the State.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 111.1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 34(c).

§ 108B-23.
Designation of administering agency powers and responsibilities.

For purposes of this Article, “Department” means the Department of Health and Human Services and “Secretary” means the Secretary of Health and Human Services.

The Department is directed to carry out the purposes and provisions of this Article. In carrying out this directive, the Secretary shall promulgate rules consistent with the purposes and provisions of this Article.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 111.1; 1989, c. 727, s. 48; c. 751, ss. 7(9), 8(11a); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, ss. 34(c), 35; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§ 108B-24.
Designation of eligible agencies.

The Secretary shall designate agencies to fulfill the requirements of this Article in the service areas governed by one or more units of local government. An agency so designated may be one of the following:

Agencies which have been officially designated as community action agencies or limited purpose agencies pursuant to Section 210 of the Economic Opportunity Act of 1964, Public Law 88-452, 78 Stat. 508 and which have not lost their designation as a result of a failure to comply with the provisions of that act.

Private nonprofit agencies designated by the chief elected official of a political subdivision or one or more political subdivisions, in areas not served by agencies as defined in subdivision (1) of this section on July 1, 1984. Agencies eligible under this subdivision must apply to the Secretary for designation 60 days in advance of the beginning date of their fiscal year. Political subdivisions designated under this section are authorized to join existing community action agencies contiguous with their boundaries or to organize their own community action agency in order to provide services pursuant to this Article.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 111.1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 34(c).

§ 108B-25.
Activities of Community Action Agency.

Agencies shall serve as the local catalyst for the reduction of the causes, conditions, and effects of poverty and shall provide social and economic opportunities that foster self-sufficiency for low-income persons. As such, agencies designated pursuant to

G.S. 108B-24(1)

shall be sponsors of the Community Services Block Grant and any successor program thereto.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 111.1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 34(c).

§ 108B-26.
Organization and authority.

Agencies, as provided in

G.S. 108B-24

shall have or be required to establish a governing board of directors which shall consist of not less than 15 nor more than 51 members. One-third of the members shall be low-income, elderly, or handicapped consumers residing in the service area of the agency. Consumer representatives shall be selected through a democratic process pursuant to guidelines established by the Department. Not less than one-third of the members of the board shall be appointed by the chief elected officials in the service area. The remaining positions on the board, if any, shall be filled by officials or members of business, industry, labor, religious, welfare, education, or civic organizations located in the service area.

The board of directors shall be responsible for all of the following:

The appointment and dismissal of an executive director.

The approval of contracts, budgets, requests, and major modifications of budgets and contracts.

The performance of an annual audit by certified public accountants to include all assets, liabilities, revenue, and expenditures.

The establishment of policies for the operation of the agency.

Annually advising the chief elected officials of the units of local government within the service area of the nature and extent of poverty within the area. Included in this annual report will be an assessment of the community action agency policies and programs and their impact on the problems of poverty in the service area.

The convening of public meetings to provide low-income and other persons the opportunity to comment upon public policies and programs to reduce poverty.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 111.1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 34(c).